Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

SUBTITLE C. STATE ACCOUNTING, FISCAL MANAGEMENT, AND PRODUCTIVITY

CHAPTER 2111. STATE AGENCY REPORTING OF TECHNOLOGICAL INNOVATIONS

Sec. 2111.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency":

(1) means an office, institution, or other agency that:

(A) is in the executive branch of state government;

(B) has authority that is not limited to a geographic portion of the state; and

(C) was created by the constitution or a statute of this state; and

(2) does not include an institution of higher education as defined by Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 2111.002. REPORTING. Each state agency shall report to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives any technological innovation developed by the agency that:

(1) has potential commercial application, is proprietary, or could be protected under intellectual property laws; and

(2) was developed:

(A) during the preceding calendar year; or

(B) before the preceding calendar year but was not previously reported to the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 16.02(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 977 (H.B. 1820), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.